Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IX.] MILITARY DEPLOYMENT PROVISIONS

[§571-91] Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Deployment" or "deployed"
means military services performed in compliance with a valid order received by
an active duty or reserve member of the armed forces of the United States or National
Guard to report for combat operations, contingency operations, peacekeeping
operations, temporary duty greater than sixty days, a remote tour of duty, or
other active service for which the deploying parent reports unaccompanied by
any family member.

"Deploying parent" or "deployed
parent" means a legal parent or a legal guardian of a child under the age
of eighteen, who is deployed, will likely deploy within the next sixty days, or
who has received written orders to deploy.

"Military service" includes the
period from which the deployed parent receives and is subject to deployment
orders and the period in which the parent is awaiting travel or remains
deployed because of sickness, wounds, leave, or other lawful cause.

"Other parent" means the legal parent
or legal guardian other than the deploying parent. [L 2010, c 177, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next